Maryland, session 2025, SB0959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0959*

SENATE BILL 959
16–103.
(a) Except as specifically provided in this title, a riparian owner may not be
deprived of any right, privilege, or enjoyment of riparian ownership that the riparian owner
had prior to July 1, 1970.
(b) The provisions of this title do not transfer the title or ownership of any land
or interest in land.
(C) ANY FAST LAND CREATED UNDER A TIDAL WETLANDS LICENSE SHALL
BE DESCRIBED BY METES AND BOUNDS.
16–201.
(a) A person who is the owner of land bounding on navigable water is entitled to
any natural accretion to the person’s land, to reclaim fast land lost by erosion or avulsion
during the person’s ownership of the land to the extent of provable existing boundaries. The
person may make improvements into the water in front of the land to preserve that person’s
access to the navigable water or, subject to subsection (c), protect the shore of that person
against erosion. After an improvement has been constructed, the improvement is the
property of the owner of the land to which the improvement is attached. A right covered in
this subtitle does not preclude the owner from developing any other use approved by the
Board. The right to reclaim lost fast land relates only to fast land lost after January 1, 1972,
and the burden of proof that the loss occurred after this date is on the owner of the land.
(b) The rights of any person, as defined in this subtitle, which existed prior to July
1, 1973 in relation to natural accretion of land are deemed to have continued to be in
existence subsequent to July 1, 1973 to July 1, 1978.
(c) (1) Improvements to protect a person’s property against erosion shall
consist of nonstructural shoreline stabilization measures that preserve the natural
environment, such as marsh creation, except:
(i) In areas designated by Department mapping as appropriate for
structural shoreline stabilization measures; and
(ii) In areas where the person can demonstrate to the Department’s
satisfaction that such measures are not feasible, including areas of excessive erosion, areas
subject to heavy tides, and areas too narrow for effective use of nonstructural shoreline
stabilization measures.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, in consultation
with the Department of Natural Resources, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(ii) Regulations adopted by the Department under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph shall include a waiver process that exempts a person from the

SENATE BILL 959 3
requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection on a demonstration to the Department’s
satisfaction that nonstructural shoreline stabilization measures are not feasible for the
person’s property.
16–206.
(A) (1) FOLLOWING THE COMPLETION OF ANY IMPROVEMENTS
CONSISTING OF SHORELINE STABILIZATION MEASURES AUTHORIZED UNDER §
16–201(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRECISELY UPDATE THE
LANDWARD BOUNDARIES OF THE RELEVANT WETLANDS.
(2) THE LANDWARD BOUNDARIES OF THE WETLANDS SHALL BE
SHOWN ON SUITABLE MAPS OR AERIAL PHOTOGRAPHS ON A SCALE OF 1 INCH TO 200
FEET.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.